Hawaii statutes.
§490:4-405 Death or incompetence of
customer. (a) A payor or collecting bank's authority to accept, pay, or
collect an item or to account for proceeds of its collection, if otherwise
effective, is not rendered ineffective by incompetence of a customer of either
bank existing at the time the item is issued or its collection is undertaken if
the bank does not know of an adjudication of incompetence. Neither death nor
incompetence of a customer revokes the authority to accept, pay, collect, or
account until the bank knows of the fact of death or of an adjudication of
incompetence and has reasonable opportunity to act on it.

(b) Even with knowledge, a bank may for ten
days after the date of death pay or certify checks drawn on or before that date
unless ordered to stop payment by a person claiming an interest in the account.
[L 1965, c 208, §4-405; HRS §490:4-405; am L 1991, c 118, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next